Florida, session 2026, SB502.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âSection 250.0311, Florida Statutes, is created 31 to read: 32 250.0311âUnited States military installations; concurrent 33 legislative jurisdiction.â 34 (1)âThis state accepts the relinquishment of exclusive 35 legislative jurisdiction from the United States in accordance 36 with this section. 37 (2)âThis state has concurrent legislative jurisdiction with 38 the United States over any United States military installation 39 under the control of the United States which is located within 40 the boundaries of this state. 41 (3)âThe concurrent legislative jurisdiction over a United 42 States military installation under this section is effective 43 upon the Governorâs written acceptance of a request filed with 44 the Secretary of State by the principal officer, or other 45 authorized representative who has supervision or control over 46 the military installation under 10 U.S.C. s. 2683, of the 47 military installation where concurrent legislative jurisdiction 48 is sought, relinquishing exclusive legislative jurisdiction and 49 retaining concurrent legislative jurisdiction over the military 50 installation. 51 (4)âThe Governor may not accept a request filed under 52 subsection (3) unless the request: 53 (a)âStates the name, position, and legal authority of the 54 individual requesting the cession. 55 (b)âUnambiguously states the subject matter for the 56 concurrent legislative jurisdiction request. 57 (c)âDescribes by metes and bounds the United States 58 military installation subject to the concurrent legislative 59 jurisdiction request. 60 (d)âIndicates whether the concurrent legislative 61 jurisdiction request includes future contiguous expansions of 62 land acquired for military purposes. 63 (5)âIf the Governor accepts a request filed under 64 subsection (3): 65 (a)âThe Governorâs acceptance must state each element of 66 the concurrent legislative jurisdiction request which is 67 accepted. 68 (b)âThe Governor shall submit the following documents to 69 the appropriate recording office for indexing and submit copies 70 of the following documents to the individual who filed the 71 request for concurrent legislative jurisdiction: 72 1.âThe request for concurrent legislative jurisdiction. 73 2.âThe Governorâs written acceptance of concurrent 74 legislative jurisdiction. 75 3.âA description by metes and bounds of the United States 76 military installation subject to the concurrent legislative 77 jurisdiction. 78 (6)âUpon request by the United States through an authorized 79 representative, the Governor is authorized to execute 80 appropriate documents to accomplish the cession granted by this 81 section. 82 (7)âUpon establishment of concurrent legislative 83 jurisdiction under this section, a state agency, local 84 government, or special district may enter a reciprocal agreement 85 with a United States agency to designate duties related to the 86 concurrent legislative jurisdiction between the parties. 87 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.